Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.105

Notice of meetings.

Written or printed notice or, if specifically permitted by the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the corporation, notice given by electronic transmission, stating the place, day and hour of the meeting and, in case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be delivered not less than ten nor more than fifty days before the date of the meeting, either personally or by mail or electronic transmission, by or at the direction of the president, or the secretary, or the officers or persons calling the meeting, to each member or shareholder entitled to vote at such meeting. If provided in the articles of incorporation, notice of regular meetings other than annual may be made by providing each member with the adopted schedule of regular meetings for the ensuing year at any time after the annual meeting and ten days prior to a regular meeting and at any time when requested by a member or by such other notice as may be prescribed by the bylaws. If mailed, such notice shall be deemed to be delivered when deposited in the United States mail, addressed to the member or shareholder at his or her address as it appears on the records of the corporation, with postage thereon prepaid. If sent by electronic transmission, the notice is deemed to be delivered when sent, addressed to the member or shareholder at his or her electronic transmission address as it appears on the records of the corporation.

[ 2000 c 167 s 3; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 21.]